Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Processing Cooperative
§ 17-10-226.
Special members' meetings.

Special members’ meetings of the members may be called by:

A majority vote of the board; or

The written petition of at least twenty percent (20%) of the patron members, twenty percent (20%) of the nonpatron members or twenty percent (20%) of all members collectively are submitted to the chair.

The cooperative shall give notice of a special members’ meeting by mailing the special members’ meeting notice to each member personally at the person’s last known post office address or an alternative method approved by the board and the member individually or the members generally. For a member that is an entity, notice mailed or delivered by an alternative method shall be to an officer of the entity. The special members’ meeting notice shall state the time, place, and purpose of the special members’ meeting. The special members’ meeting notice shall be issued within ten (10) days from and after the date of the presentation of a members’ petition, and the special members’ meeting shall be held within thirty (30) days after the date of the presentation of the members’ petition.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-227.
Certification of meeting notice.

After mailing special or regular members’ meeting notices or otherwise delivering the notices, the cooperative shall execute a certificate containing the date of mailing or delivery of the notice and a statement that the special or regular members’ meeting notices were mailed or delivered as prescribed by law.

The certificate shall be made a part of the record of the meeting.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-228.
Failure to receive meeting notice.

Failure of a member to receive a special or regular members’ meeting notice does not invalidate an action that is taken by the members at a members’ meeting.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-229.
Quorum.

The quorum for a members’ meeting to transact business shall be:

Ten percent (10%) of the total number of members for a cooperative with five hundred (500) or less members; or

Fifty (50) members for cooperatives with more than five hundred (500) members.

In determining a quorum at a meeting, on a question submitted to a vote by mail or an alternative method, members present in person or represented by mail vote or the alternative voting method shall be counted. The attendance of a sufficient number of members to constitute a quorum shall be established by a registration of the members of the cooperative present at the meeting. The registration shall be verified by the chair or the records officer of the cooperative and shall be reported in the minutes of the meeting.

An action by a cooperative is not valid or legal in the absence of a quorum at the meeting at which the action was taken.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-230.
Member voting rights.

A patron member of a cooperative is only entitled to one (1) vote on an issue to be voted upon by members holding patron membership interests, except that a patron member of a cooperative described in W.S.

17-10-231

may be entitled to more than one (1) vote as provided in that section. On any matter of the cooperative, the entire patron members voting power shall be voted collectively based upon the vote of the majority of patron members voting on the issue. A nonpatron member has the voting rights in accordance to his nonpatron membership interests as granted in the bylaws, subject to the provisions of this article.

A member or delegate may exercise voting rights on any matter that is before the members as prescribed in the articles or bylaws at a members’ meeting from the time the member or delegate arrives at the members’ meeting, unless the articles or bylaws specify an earlier and specific time for closing the right to vote.

A member’s vote at a members’ meeting shall be in person or by mail if a mail vote is authorized by the board or by alternative method if authorized by the board, and not by proxy except as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

The following shall apply to members represented by delegates:

A cooperative may provide in the articles or bylaws that units or districts of members are entitled to be represented at members’ meetings by delegates chosen by the members of the unit or district. The delegates may vote on matters at the members’ meeting in the same manner as a member. The delegates may only exercise the voting rights on a basis and with the number of votes as prescribed in the articles or bylaws;

If the approval of a certain portion of the members is required for adoption of amendments, a dissolution, a merger, a consolidation, or a sale of assets, the votes of delegates shall be counted as votes by the members represented by the delegate;

Patron members may be represented by the proxy of other patron members;

Nonpatron members may be represented by proxy if authorized in the bylaws.

The following shall apply to absentee ballots:

A member who is or will be absent from a members’ meeting may vote by mail or by an approved alternative method on the ballot prescribed in this subsection on any motion, resolution or amendment that the board submits for vote by mail or alternative method to the members;

The ballot shall be in the form prescribed by the board and contain:

The exact text of the proposed motion, resolution or amendment to be acted on at the meeting; and

The text of the motion, resolution or amendment for which the member may indicate an affirmative or negative vote.

The member shall express a choice by marking an appropriate choice on the ballot and mail, deliver or otherwise submit the ballot to the cooperative in a plain, sealed envelope inside another envelope bearing the member’s name or by an alternative method approved by the board;

A properly executed ballot shall be accepted by the board and counted as the vote of the absent member at the meeting.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-231.
Patron member voting in cooperatives constituted entirely or partially of other cooperatives or associations.

A cooperative that is constituted entirely or partially of other cooperatives or associations may authorize by the articles or the bylaws for affiliated cooperative patron members to have an additional vote for:

A stipulated amount of business transacted between the patron member cooperative and the central cooperative organization;

A stipulated number of patron members in the member cooperative;

A certain stipulated amount of equity allocated to or held by the patron member cooperative in the cooperative central organization; or

A combination of methods in paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection.

A cooperative that is organized into units or districts of patron members, may, by the articles or the bylaws, authorize the delegates elected by its patron members or, have an additional vote for:

A stipulated amount of business transacted between the patron members in the units or districts and the cooperative;

A certain stipulated amount of equity allocated to or held by the patron members of the units or districts of the cooperative; or

A combination of methods in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-232.
Vote of ownership interests held by cooperative.

A cooperative that holds ownership interests of another business entity may, by direction of the cooperative’s board, elect or appoint a person to represent the cooperative at a meeting of the business entity. The representative has authority to represent the cooperative and may cast the cooperative’s vote at the business entity’s meeting.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-233.
Allocations and distributions to members.

The bylaws shall prescribe the allocation of profits and losses between patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests. If the bylaws do not otherwise provide, the profits and losses between patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests shall be allocated on the basis of the value of contributions to capital made by the patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests and accepted by the cooperative. The allocation of profits to the patron membership interests collectively shall not be less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total profits in any fiscal year.

The bylaws shall prescribe the distribution of cash or other assets of the cooperative among the membership interests of the cooperative. If not otherwise provided in the bylaws, distribution shall be made to the patron membership interests collectively and other members on the basis of the value of contributions to capital made and accepted by the cooperative by the patron membership interests collectively and other membership interests. The distributions to patron membership interests collectively shall not be less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total distributions in any fiscal year.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-234.
Allocations and distributions to patron members.

A cooperative may set aside a portion of net income allocated to the patron membership interests as the board determines advisable to create or maintain a capital reserve.

In addition to a capital reserve, the board may, for patron membership interests:

Set aside an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the annual net income of the cooperative for promoting and encouraging cooperative organization; and

Establish and accumulate reserves for new buildings, machinery and equipment, depreciation, losses, and other proper purposes.

Net income allocated to patron members in excess of dividends on equity and additions to reserves shall be distributed to patron members on the basis of patronage. A cooperative may establish allocation units, whether the units are functional, divisional, departmental, geographic, or otherwise and pooling arrangements and may account for and distribute net income to patrons on the basis of allocation units and pooling arrangements. A cooperative may offset the net loss of an allocation unit or pooling arrangement against the net income of other allocation units or pooling arrangements.

Distribution of net income shall be made at least annually. The board shall present to the members at their annual meeting a report covering the operations of the cooperative during the preceding fiscal year.

A cooperative may distribute net income to patron members in cash, capital credits, allocated patronage equities, revolving fund certificates, or its own or other securities.

The cooperative may provide in the bylaws that nonmember patrons are allowed to participate in the distribution of net income payable to patron members on equal terms with patron members.

If a nonmember patron with patronage credits is not qualified or eligible for membership, a refund due may be credited to the patron’s individual account. The board may issue a certificate of interest to reflect the credited amount. After the patron is issued a certificate of interest, the patron may participate in the distribution of income on the same basis as a patron member.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-235.
Distribution of unclaimed property.

A cooperative may, in lieu of paying or delivering to the state the unclaimed property specified in its report of unclaimed property, distribute the unclaimed property to a corporation or organization that is exempt from taxation. A cooperative making the election to distribute unclaimed property shall file with the secretary of state:

A verified written explanation of the proof of claim of an owner establishing a right to receive the abandoned property;

Any error in the presumption of abandonment;

The name, address, and exemption number of the corporation or organization to which the property was or is to be distributed; and

The approximate date of distribution.

This subsection does not alter the procedure provided by law for cooperatives to report unclaimed property to the state and the requirement that claims of owners are made to the cooperatives for a period following the publication of lists of abandoned property.

The right of an owner to unclaimed property held by a cooperative is extinguished when the property is disbursed by the cooperative to a tax exempt organization in accordance with this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-236.
Merger and consolidation.

Unless otherwise prohibited, cooperatives organized under the laws of this state may merge or consolidate with each other or other business entities organized under the laws of this state or another state by complying with the provisions of this section or the law of the state where the surviving or new business entity will exist.

To initiate a merger or consolidation of a cooperative, a written plan of merger or consolidation shall be prepared by the board or by a committee selected by the board to prepare a plan. The plan shall state:

The names of the constituent cooperatives and other business entities;

The name of the surviving or new cooperative or other business entity;

The manner and basis of converting membership or ownership interests of the constituent cooperatives or business entities into membership or ownership interests in the surviving or new cooperative or business entity;

The terms of the merger or consolidation;

The proposed effect of the consolidation or merger on the members and patron members of the cooperative; and

For a consolidation, the plan shall contain the articles of the entity or organizational documents to be filed with the state in which the entity is organized.

The following shall apply to notice:

The board shall mail a merger or consolidation or otherwise transmit or deliver notice to each member. The notice shall contain:

The full text of the plan; and

The time and place of the meeting at which the plan will be considered.

A cooperative with more than two hundred (200) members may provide the merger or consolidation notice in the same manner as a regular members’ meeting notice.

The following shall apply to the adoption of a plan or merger or consolidation:

A plan of merger or consolidation is adopted if:

A quorum of the members is registered as being present or represented by mail vote at the meeting; and

The plan is approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast, or for a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast or other conditions for approval, the plan is approved by a proportion of the votes cast or a number of total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

After the plan has been adopted, articles of merger or consolidation stating the plan and that the plan was adopted according to this article shall be signed by the chair, vice-chair, records officer or documents officer of each cooperative merging or consolidating;

The articles of merger or consolidation shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state;

For a merger, the articles of the surviving cooperative subject to this article are deemed amended to the extent provided in the articles of merger;

Unless a later date is provided in the plan, the merger or consolidation is effective when the articles of merger or consolidation are filed in the office of the secretary of state;

The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of organization of the merged or consolidated cooperative.

The following shall apply to the effect of a merger:

After the effective date, the cooperatives or other business entities that are parties to the plan become a single entity. For a merger, the surviving business entity is the business entity designated in the plan. For a consolidation, the new cooperative or other business entity is the business entity provided for in the plan. Except for the surviving or new business entity, the separate existence of all business entities that are parties to the plan cease on the effective date of the merger or consolidation;

The surviving or new business entity possesses all of the rights and property of each of the merged or consolidated business entities and is responsible for all their obligations. The title to property of the merged or consolidated business entity is vested in the surviving or new business entity without reversion or impairment of the title caused by the merger or consolidation;

The right of a creditor may not be impaired by the merger or consolidation without the creditor’s consent.

The fee to be paid to the secretary of state for filing articles of merger or consolidation shall conform with the provisions of W.S.

17-16-122

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-237.
Liquidation.

A cooperative shall be liquidated as provided in the articles in a manner consistent with other business entities organized in this state or if not provided, may be liquidated in the same manner as a limited liability company organized in this state or the members may authorize a liquidation by adopting a resolution at a members’ meeting. The notice of the members’ meeting shall include a statement that the disposition of all of the assets of the cooperative will be considered at the meeting. If a quorum is present in person, by mail ballot, or alternative method approved by the board at the members’ meeting, the resolution approving of the liquidation is adopted if:

Approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast; or

For a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than two-thirds (2/3) for approval or other conditions for approval, the resolution is approved by the proportion of the votes cast or a number of total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

The board of directors by resolution may liquidate a cooperative if the board obtains an opinion of an accountant that the cooperative is unlikely to continue as a business based on its current finances.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-238.
Methods of dissolution.

A cooperative may be dissolved by the members or by order of the court.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-239.
Winding up.

After the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the board, or the officers acting under the direction of the board, shall proceed as soon as possible:

To collect or make provision for the collection of all debts due or owing to the cooperative, including unpaid subscriptions for shares; and

To pay or make provision for the payment of all debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative according to their priorities.

After the notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state, the board may sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the dissolving cooperative without a vote of the members.

Tangible and intangible property, including money, remaining after the discharge of the debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative may be distributed to the members and former members as provided in the bylaws. If previously authorized by the members, the tangible and intangible property of the cooperative may be liquidated and disposed of at the discretion of the board.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-240.
Revocation of dissolution proceedings.

Dissolution proceedings may be revoked before the articles of dissolution are filed with the secretary of state.

The chair may call a members’ meeting to consider the advisability of revoking the dissolution proceedings. The question of the proposed revocation shall be submitted to the members at the members’ meeting called to consider the revocation. The dissolution proceedings are revoked if the proposed revocation is approved at the members’ meeting by a majority of the members of the cooperative or for a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring a greater number of members, the number of members required by the articles or bylaws.

Revocation of dissolution proceedings is effective when a notice of revocation is filed with the secretary of state. After the notice is filed, the cooperative may resume business.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-241.
Statute of limitations.

The claim of a creditor or claimant against a dissolving cooperative is barred if the claim has not been enforced by initiating legal, administrative or arbitration proceedings concerning the claim by two (2) years after the date the notice of intent to dissolve is filed with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-242.
Articles of dissolution.

Articles of dissolution of a cooperative shall be filed with the secretary of state after payment of the claims of all known creditors and claimants has been made or provided for and the remaining property has been distributed by the board. The articles of dissolution shall state:

That all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the cooperative have been paid or discharged or adequate provisions have been made for them or time periods allowing claims have run and other claims are not outstanding;

That the remaining property, assets, and claims of the cooperative have been distributed among the members or pursuant to a liquidation authorized by the members; and

That legal, administrative, or arbitration proceedings by or against the cooperative are not pending or adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of a judgment, order or decree that may be entered against the cooperative in a pending proceeding.

The cooperative is dissolved when the articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall issue to the dissolved cooperative or its legal representative a certificate of dissolution that contains:

The name of the dissolved cooperative;

The date the articles of dissolution were filed with the secretary of state; and

A statement that the cooperative is dissolved.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-243.
Application for court-supervised voluntary dissolution.

After a notice of intent to dissolve has been filed with the secretary of state and before a certificate of dissolution has been issued, the cooperative or, for good cause shown, a member or creditor may apply to a court within the county where the registered address is located to have the dissolution conducted or continued under the supervision of the court as provided in W.S.

17-10-250

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-244.
Court-ordered remedies or dissolution.

A court may grant equitable relief that it deems just and reasonable in the circumstances or may dissolve a cooperative and liquidate its assets and business in any of the following circumstances:

In a supervised voluntary dissolution that is applied for by the cooperative;

In an action by a member when it is established that:

The directors or the persons having the authority otherwise vested in the board are deadlocked in the management of the cooperative’s affairs and the members are unable to break the deadlock;

The directors or those in control of the cooperative have acted fraudulently, illegally or in a manner unfairly prejudicial toward one (1) or more members in their capacities as members, directors or officers;

The members of the cooperative are so divided in voting power that, for a period that includes the time when two (2) consecutive regular members’ meetings were held, they have failed to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election and qualification of their successors;

The cooperative assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

The period of duration as provided in the articles has expired and has not been extended as provided in this article.

In an action by a creditor when:

The claim of the creditor against the cooperative has been reduced to judgment and an execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied; or

The cooperative has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor against the cooperative is due and owing and it is established that the cooperative is unable to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business.

In an action by the attorney general to dissolve the cooperative in accordance with this article when it is established that a decree of dissolution is appropriate.

In determining whether to order equitable relief or dissolution, the court shall take into consideration the financial condition of the cooperative but may not refuse to order equitable relief or dissolution solely on the ground that the cooperative has accumulated operating net income or current operating net income.

In deciding whether to order dissolution of the cooperative, the court shall consider whether lesser relief suggested by one (1) or more parties, such as a form of equitable relief or a partial liquidation, would be adequate to permanently relieve the circumstances established under subparagraph (a)(ii)(B) or (C) of this section. Lesser relief may be ordered if it would be appropriate under the facts and circumstances of the case.

If the court finds that a party to a proceeding brought under this section has acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or otherwise not in good faith, the court may in its discretion award reasonable expenses, including attorneys’ fees and disbursements, to any of the other parties.

Proceedings under this section shall be brought in a court within the county where the registered address of the cooperative is located.

It is not necessary to make members parties to the action or proceeding unless relief is sought against them personally.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “in any of the following circumstances” in the introductory language of (a); deleted “or” at the end of (a)(iii)(B), and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-10-245.
Procedure in involuntary or court-supervised voluntary dissolution.

In dissolution proceedings before a hearing can be completed the court may:

Issue injunctions;

Appoint receivers with all powers and duties that the court directs;

Take actions required to preserve the cooperative’s assets wherever located; and

Carry on the business of the cooperative.

After a hearing is completed, on notice the court directs to be given to parties to the proceedings and to other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a receiver to collect the cooperative’s assets, including amounts owing to the cooperative by subscribers on account of an unpaid portion of the consideration for the issuance of shares. A receiver has authority, subject to the order of the court, to continue the business of the cooperative and to sell, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of the property and assets of the cooperative either at public or private sale.

The assets of the cooperative or the proceeds resulting from a sale, lease, transfer, or other disposition shall be applied in the following order of priority:

The costs and expenses of the proceedings, including attorneys’ fees and disbursements;

Debts, taxes and assessments due the United States, this state and other states in that order;

Claims duly proved and allowed to employees under the provisions of the workers’ compensation act except that claims under this clause may not be allowed if the cooperative has carried workers’ compensation insurance, as provided by law, at the time the injury was sustained;

Claims, including the value of all compensation paid in a medium other than money, proved and allowed to employees for services performed within three (3) months preceding the appointment of the receiver, if any; and

Other claims proved and allowed.

After payment of the expenses of receivership and claims of creditors are proved, the remaining assets, if any, may be distributed to the members or distributed pursuant to an approved liquidation plan.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

Worker's Compensation Act. —

See §§ 27-14-101(a), 27-14-102(a)(xxvii).

§ 17-10-246.
Receiver qualifications and powers.

A receiver shall be a natural person or a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state. A receiver shall give a bond as directed by the court with the sureties required by the court.

A receiver may sue and defend in all courts as receiver of the cooperative. The court appointing the receiver has exclusive jurisdiction of the cooperative and its property.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-247.
Dissolution action by attorney general; administrative dissolution.

A cooperative may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree of a court in this state in an action filed by the attorney general if it is established that:

The articles and certificate of organization were procured through fraud;

The cooperative was organized for a purpose not permitted by this article or prohibited by state law;

The cooperative has flagrantly violated a provision of this article, has violated a provision of this article more than once or has violated more than one (1) provision of this article; or

The cooperative has acted, or failed to act, in a manner that constitutes surrender or abandonment of the cooperative’s franchise, privileges, or enterprise.

An action may not be commenced under subsection (a) of this section until thirty (30) days after notice to the cooperative by the attorney general of the reason for the filing of the action. If the reason for filing the action is an act that the cooperative has done, or omitted to do, and the act or omission may be corrected by an amendment of the articles or bylaws or by performance of or abstention from the act, the attorney general shall give the cooperative thirty (30) additional days to make the correction before filing the action.

The provisions of W.S.

17-16-1420

through

17-16-1423

shall apply to the administrative dissolution of any domestic cooperative and the provisions of W.S.

17-16-1530

through

17-16-1532

shall apply to the administrative dissolution of any foreign cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-248.
Filing claims in court-supervised dissolution proceedings.

In proceedings to dissolve a cooperative, the court may require all creditors and claimants of the cooperative to file their claims under oath with the court administrator or with the receiver in a form prescribed by the court.

If the court requires the filing of claims, the court shall:

Set a date, by order, at least one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the order is filed, as the last day for the filing of claims; and

Prescribe the notice of the fixed date that shall be given to creditors and claimants.

Before the fixed date, the court may extend the time for filing claims. Creditors and claimants failing to file claims on or before the fixed date may be barred, by order of court, from claiming an interest in or receiving payment out of the property or assets of the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-249.
Discontinuance of court-supervised dissolution proceedings.

The involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution of a cooperative may be discontinued at any time during the dissolution proceedings if it is established that cause for dissolution does not exist. The court shall dismiss the proceedings and direct the receiver, if any, to redeliver to the cooperative its remaining property and assets.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-250.
Court-supervised dissolution order.

In an involuntary or supervised voluntary dissolution after the costs and expenses of the proceedings and all debts, obligations and liabilities of the cooperative have been paid or discharged and the remaining property and assets have been distributed to its members or, if its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and discharge the costs, expenses, debts, obligations and liabilities, when all the property and assets have been applied so far as they will go to their payment according to their priorities, the court shall enter an order dissolving the cooperative.

When the order dissolving the cooperative or association has been entered, the cooperative or association is dissolved.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-251.
Filing court's dissolution order.

After the court enters an order dissolving a cooperative, the court administrator shall cause a certified copy of the dissolution order to be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state may not charge a fee for filing the dissolution order.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-252.
Barring of claims.

A person who is or becomes a creditor or claimant before, during, or following the conclusion of dissolution proceedings, who does not file a claim or pursue a remedy in a legal, administrative or arbitration proceeding during the pendency of the dissolution proceeding or has not initiated a legal, administrative, or arbitration proceeding before the commencement of the dissolution proceedings and all those claiming through or under the creditor or claimant, are forever barred from suing on that claim or otherwise realizing upon or enforcing it, except as provided in this section.

Within one (1) year after articles of dissolution have been filed with the secretary of state pursuant to this article or a dissolution order has been entered, a creditor or claimant who shows good cause for not having previously filed the claim may apply to a court in this state to allow a claim:

Against the cooperative to the extent of undistributed assets; or

If the undistributed assets are not sufficient to satisfy the claim, the claim may be allowed against a member to the extent of the distributions to members in dissolution received by the member.

Debts, obligations, and liabilities incurred during dissolution proceedings shall be paid or provided for by the cooperative before the distribution of assets to a member. A person to whom this kind of debt, obligation, or liability is owed but is not paid may pursue any remedy against the officers, directors or members of the cooperative before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations. This subsection does not apply to dissolution under the supervision or order of a court.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-253.
Right to sue or defend after dissolution.

After a cooperative has been dissolved, any of its former officers, directors or members may assert or defend, in the name of the cooperative, a claim by or against the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.